Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-423
License; qualified applicants.

(1) Any nonprofit organization holding a certificate of exemption under section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code or any volunteer fire company or volunteer first-aid, rescue, ambulance, or emergency squad may apply for a license to conduct a lottery or raffle.

(2) Prior to applying for any license, an organization shall:

(a) Be incorporated in this state as a not-for-profit corporation or organized in this state as a religious or not-for-profit organization;

(b) Have at least ten members in good standing;

(c) Conduct activities within this state in addition to the conduct of lotteries or raffles;

(d) Be authorized by its constitution, articles, charter, or bylaws to further in this state a lawful purpose; and

(e) Operate without profit to its members, and no part of the net earnings of such organization shall inure to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 144;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 42.